Washington statutes.
RCW 36.23.090

Search for birth parents—County clerk's duty.

The county clerk shall provide the name and telephone number of at least one resource to assist adopted persons who are searching for birth parents, or birth parents who are searching for children they have relinquished, if these resources have contacted the clerk's office and requested that their name be made available to persons making inquiry.

[ 1990 c 146 s 10.]